it: Convertitore audio D/A (DAC): Marrone radica; Coassiale; DSD; ESS sabre; Integrato; Ottico; PCM; TOSLINK; USB; Altro
sl-SI: Digitalno-analogni pretvornik (DAC) zvoka: Burr-Brown; Koaksialni; DSD; ESS sabre; Integriran; Optično; PCM; TOSLINK; USB; Drugo
nb: D/A-konverter til lyd (Dac): Burr-brun; Koaksial; DSD; ESS-sabel; Integrert; Optisk; PCM; TOSLINK; USB; Annet
fr: Convertisseur numérique-analogique audio: Brun-brun; Coaxiale; DSD; Sabre ESS; Intégré; Optique; PCM; TOSLINK; USB; Autre
ko: 오디오 D/A 변환기(DAC): Burr-brown; 동축; DSD; ESS sabre; 통합; 광학; PCM; 토스링크; USB; 기타
es: Convertidor de audio D/A (DAC): Burr-Brown; Coaxial; DSD; ESS sabre; Integrado; Óptico; PCM; TOSLINK; USB; Otros
sk-SK: Zvukový D/A prevodník (DAC): Burr-brown; Koaxiálny; DSD; ESS sabre; Integrovaný; Optický; PCM; TOSLINK; USB; Iné
hr-HR: Digitalno-analogni audio pretvarač (DAC): Burr-brown; Koaksijalni; DSD; ESS sabre; Integrirani; Optički; PCM; TOSLINK; USB; Ostalo
da: Audio D/A-konverter (Dac): Burr-brun; Koaksial; DSD; ESS-sabel; Integreret; Optisk; PCM; TOSLINK; USB; Andet
pl: Konwerter audio D/A (Dac): Burr-brown; Współosiowy; DSD; ESS sabre; Zintegrowany; Optyczne; PCM; TOSLINK; USB; Inne
fi: Audio D/A -muunnin (Dac, digitaali-analogiamuunnin): Burr-brown; Koaksiaalinen; DSD; ESS sabre; Integroitu; Optinen; PCM; TOSLINK; USB; Muu
de: Audio-D/A-Wandler (DAC): Burr-brown; Koaxial; DSD; ESS Sabre; Integriert; Optisch; PCM; TOSLINK; USB; Sonstiges
pt-PT: Conversor de áudio D/A (DAC): Burr-Brown; Coaxial; DSD; ESS Sabre; Integrado; Ótico; PCM; TOSLINK; USB; Outro
zh-TW: 音訊 D/A 轉換器 (DAC): Burr-brown; 同軸; DSD; 音訊儲存系統; 融合的; 光學; PCM; TOSLINK; USB; 其他
vi: Bộ chuyển đổi D/A âm thanh (Dac): Burr-brown; Đồng trục; DSD; ESS sabre; Tích hợp; Quang học; PCM; TOSLINK; USB; Khác
cs: DAC převodník audio signálu: Burr-brown; Koaxiální; DSD; ESS sabre; Integrovaný; Optická; PCM; TOSLINK; USB; Jiné
en: Audio D/A converter (DAC): Burr-brown; Coaxial; DSD; ESS sabre; Integrated; Optical; PCM; TOSLINK; USB; Other
el: Μετατροπέας ήχου D/A (DAC): Burr-brown; Ομοαξονικό καλώδιο; DSD; ESS sabre; Ενσωματωμένος; Οπτικό καλώδιο; PCM; TOSLINK; USB; Άλλο
ru: Звуковой цифро-аналоговый преобразователь: Burr-Brown; Коаксиальный; DSD; ESS Sabre; Интегрированный; Оптический; PCM; TOSLINK; USB; Другой
nl: Audio-DA-converter (DAC): Burr-brown; Coaxiaal; DSD; ESS sabre; Geïntegreerd; Optisch; PCM; TOSLINK; USB; Andere
ro-RO: Convertor audio D/A (DAC): Burr-brown; Coaxial; DSD; ESS sabre; Integrat; Optic; PCM; TOSLINK; USB; Altele
tr: Ses D/A Dönüştürücü (Dac): Burr-brown; Koaksiyel; DSD; ESS sabre; Birleşik; Optik; PCM; TOSLINK; USB; Diğer
th: ตัวแปลงสัญญาณเสียง D/A (Dac): Burr-Brown; โคแอกเซียล; DSD; ESS sabre; ในตัว; ออปติคัล; PCM; TOSLINK; USB; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Garso skaitmeninis-analoginis keitiklis (DAC): „Burr-brown“; Bendraašis; DSD; ESS sabre; Integruotas; Optinis; PCM; TOSLINK; USB; Kita
pt-BR: Conversor de áudio D/A (Dac): Burr-brown; Coaxial; DSD; ESS sabre; Integrado; Óptica; PCM; TOSLINK; USB; Outro
sv: Ljud D/A-konverterare (Dac): Burr-brun; Koaxial; DSD; ESS sabel; Integrerad; Optisk; PCM; TOSLINK; USB; Övrigt
bg-BG: Конвертор на аудио D/A конвертор: Burr-brown; Коаксиален; DSD; ESS sabre; Интегриран; Оптичен; PCM; TOSLINK; USB; Други
ja: オーディオD/Aコンバーター （DAC）: バーブラウン; 同軸; DSD; ESSセイバー; 一体型; 光学式; PCM; トスリンク; USB; その他
zh-CN: 音频 D/A 转换器 (DAC): Burr-brown; 同轴; DSD; ESS sabre; 集成; 光学; PCM; TOSLINK; USB; 其他
hu: Hang D/A konverter (DAC): Burr-Brown; Koaxiális; DSD; ESS Sabre; Integrált; Optikai; PCM; TOSLINK; USB; Egyéb